West Virginia, session 2025, SB670.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 2A. West Virginia Commissioner of Highways. §17-2A-4c. Locality pay for certain Division of Highways employees. The commissioner of highways is authorized to approve a locality pay differential for any employee of the Division of Highways who works in a jurisdiction designated by the commissioner as one where locality pay is necessary to maintain the division's ability to recruit and retain employees in a competitive manner. A locality pay differential provided pursuant to this section may exceed the maximum salary range established for the employee's position classification, but shall not exceed $10,000 per year in addition to the employee's regular salary or hourly pay. The commissioner shall propose rules for legislative approval in accordance with the provisions of §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code to effectuate the purposes of this section.